Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1206
Job training grants; monitor and audit project.

The Department of Economic Development shall monitor the progress of job training projects conducted pursuant to job training grants. As deemed necessary, the department may conduct a site audit of job training projects and review business records pertaining to the job training project.

Laws 1995, LB 326, § 5.